Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. Weight Regulations

§ 1391.
Tire and axle limits.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person or corporation shall not operate or cause to be operated a tractor, trailer, semi-trailer, motor truck, or any other motor vehicle without sufficient weight maintained upon the front axle of such vehicle to make such vehicle safe in operation, nor shall the maximum load on any axle of such vehicle exceed a gross weight of more than 600 pounds per inch of tire width computed in conformity with the manufacturer’s designated width.

No single axle load shall be in excess of 22,400 pounds and a 10 percent tolerance shall be allowed on each single axle load, nor shall any tandem axle load be in excess of 36,000 pounds, with a 10 percent tolerance allowed, except in the case of such vehicles owned by persons to whom special permits shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of section 1400 of this title.

Unless federal law authorizes the axle load limits, tolerances, or both, provided for in subsection (b) of this section to apply on those highways designated as the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, no single axle load on those highways shall be in excess of 20,000 pounds with no tolerance allowed, nor shall any tandem axle load be in excess of 34,000 pounds, with no tolerance allowed, except in the case of vehicles owned by persons to whom special permits have been issued in accordance with section 1400 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 206

, § 4;

1964, No. 4

(Sp. Sess.), eff. Feb. 27, 1964;

1971, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1977, No. 41

, § 1, eff. April 19, 1977;

1983, No. 86

, § 1;

1991, No. 72

, § 4;

2009, No. 63

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 13, 2010;

2009, No. 63

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, see effective date note;

2011, No. 23

, § 1, eff. May 11, 2011;

2021, No. 20

, § 245.

§ 1391a.
Penalties for overweight operation.

Civil penalties for violations of the following statutory sections shall be in accordance with the schedule established in this section:

Click to view

For violation of each of the statutory sections listed in subsection (a) of this section, civil penalties shall be imposed as follows:
(b) (1) For violation of each of the statutory sections listed in subsection (a) of this section, civil penalties shall be imposed as follows:

Civil penalties for subsequent violations of subchapter 15, article 1 of this chapter shall be computed in accordance with subdivision (b)(1) of this section with the following percentage increases:

upon a second conviction of a violation occurring within one year, five percent;

upon a third conviction of a violation occurring within one year, ten percent;

upon a fourth or subsequent conviction occurring within one year, 15 percent.

In the calculation of gross overweight, the weight allowed by registration or permit, whichever is greater, shall be the basis. The tolerances allowed by sections 1391, 1392, 1408, and 1410 of this title shall not be considered in the calculation of gross overweight.

$15.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight for the first 5,000 lbs. overweight;

$30.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight when the gross overweight is more than 5,000 lbs. and less than 10,001 lbs.;

$45.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight when the gross overweight is more than 10,000 lbs. and less than 15,001 lbs.;

$60.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight when the gross overweight is more than 15,000 lbs. and less than 20,001 lbs.;

$90.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight when the gross overweight is more than 20,000 lbs. and less than 25,001 lbs.; and

$150.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight when the gross overweight is more than 25,000 lbs.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, in a prosecution for a violation of those statutes listed in subsection (a) of this section, the proper defendant shall be either the owner or lessee of the vehicle or the person who moves or operates the vehicle.

Civil penalties imposed for violations of this section shall be deposited in the Transportation Fund, unless the civil penalties are the result of enforcement actions on a town highway by an enforcement officer employed by or under contract with the municipality, in which case the civil penalty shall be paid to the municipality, except for an administrative charge for each case in the amount specified in

13 V.S.A. § 7251

, which shall be retained by the State.

Statutory Citation Name of Offense

23 V.S.A. § 1391

Tire and axle limits

23 V.S.A. § 1392

Gross limits on highways

23 V.S.A. § 1399

Construction and maintenance equipment; fire apparatus

23 V.S.A. § 1400

Permit to operate in excess of weight and size limits; State highways 23 V.S.A § 1400a Special local highway and bridge limits; reimbursement for damages; special permits

23 V.S.A. § 1407

Operation of overweight vehicles

23 V.S.A. § 1408

Operating vehicle in excess of registered capacity

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 1, 1978; amended

1983, No. 86

, § 2;

1983, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 27, 1984;

1989, No. 51

, § 43;

1993, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1995, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 25, 1996;

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 9a;

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 34;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 72;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 202.

§ 1392.
Gross weight limits on highways.

Except as provided in section 1400 of this title, a person or corporation shall not operate or cause to be operated a motor vehicle in excess of the total weight, including vehicle, object, or contrivance and load, of:

16,000 pounds upon any bridge with a wood floor, wood subfloor, or wood stringers on a class 3 or 4 town highway or 20,000 pounds on a bridge with wood floor, wood subfloor, or wood stringers on a class 1 or 2 town highway unless otherwise posted by the selectboard of such town.

24,000 pounds, upon a class 2, 3, or 4 town highway or bridge with other than wood floor, in any town or incorporated village.

No vehicle may exceed a gross weight in excess of 80,000 pounds unless the operator or owner of the vehicle has complied with the provisions of section 1400 of this title or except as otherwise provided in this section.

Subject to the limit upon the weight imposed upon the highway through any single or tandem axle as set forth in section 1391 of this title, the total gross weight of vehicle with load imposed upon the highway by all axles of a vehicle or combination of axles of a vehicle shall not be in excess of the value in pounds given for the respective distance between the first and last axle of the vehicle or combination of axle spacing for vehicles measured longitudinally to the nearest foot as set forth in the following table:

Click to view

Despite the axle load provisions of section 1391 of this title and the distance in feet between first and last axle as provided for in subdivision (4) of this section, a motor truck having three axles, if the two rear axles are both power driven and both equipped with adequate brakes, the gross weight of the three axles of the truck shall not exceed 55,000 pounds.
(5) (A) Despite the axle load provisions of section 1391 of this title and the distance in feet between first and last axle as provided for in subdivision (4) of this section, a motor truck having three axles, if the two rear axles are both power driven and both equipped with adequate brakes, the gross weight of the three axles of the truck shall not exceed 55,000 pounds.

When application is made to register a motor truck under the provisions of this subdivision, the applicant shall submit to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles specifications as to its make, brake equipment, and manufacturer’s recommended gross weight. In the Commissioner’s discretion, the Commissioner may refuse registration for its operation under this subdivision if the specifications for the vehicle would not permit its safe operation when so loaded.

Despite the axle load provisions of section 1391 of this title and the distance in feet between first and last axle as provided for in subdivision (4) of this section, a motor truck having four axles, three of which are a tri-axle and at least two axles in this group being power driven and equipped with adequate brakes; the gross weight of the four axles of the truck shall not exceed 60,000 pounds, however:

No two axles in the tri-axle group shall support more than 42,000 pounds with a 10 percent tolerance.

No single axle of the tri-axle group shall support more than 22,400 pounds with a 10 percent tolerance.

The total load supported by the tri-axle group shall not exceed 54,000 pounds.

Three or more axles within a distance of 12 feet or less apart shall be considered as a tri-axle group, and if a single axle is closer than eight feet to the nearest axle of the tri-axle group, the total load shall not exceed that allowed for a tri-axle group.

[Repealed.]

-(10) [Repealed.]

(11)

The weights or tolerances, or both, as set forth in subdivisions (5) and (6) of this section shall not apply to the highways designated as portions of the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways unless authorized by federal law.

(12)

[Repealed.]

(13)

Despite the axle-load provisions of section 1391 of this title and the maximum gross load of subdivision (4) of this section, a special annual permit, which shall expire with the vehicle’s registration, except for vehicles not registered in Vermont in which case the permit shall become void on January 1 following date of issue, may be issued to a person or corporation operating on designated routes on the State Highway System for a fee of $415.00 for each vehicle that must be registered for a weight of 80,000 pounds. This special permit shall be issued only for a combination of vehicle and semi-trailer or trailer equipped with five or more axles, with a distance between axles that meets the minimum requirements of registering the vehicle to 80,000 pounds as allowed under subdivision (4) of this section. The maximum gross load under this special permit shall be 90,000 pounds. Unless authorized by federal law, this subdivision shall not apply to operation on the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways.

(14)

Despite the axle-load provisions of section 1391 of this title and the axle spacing and maximum gross load provisions of subdivision (4) of this section, a special annual permit, which shall expire with the vehicle’s registration, except for vehicles not registered in Vermont in which case the permit shall become void on January 1 following date of issue, may be issued to a person or corporation transporting loads on vehicles on designated routes on the State Highway System for the following fees for each vehicle unit. Unless authorized by federal law, the provisions of this subdivision regarding weight limits, tolerances, or both, shall not apply to operation on the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways. This special permit shall be issued for the following vehicles and conditions:

3-axle trucks with a single steering axle and a rear tandem axle that have a maximum gross weight of not more than 60,000 pounds when registered for a minimum gross weight of not more than 55,000 pounds, the permit fee shall be $156.00.

4-axle trucks with a single steering axle and a rear tri-axle unit that have a maximum gross weight of not more than 69,000 pounds when registered for a minimum weight of 60,000 pounds, the permit fee shall be $352.00.

4-axle tractor semi-trailer or truck trailer combination with a maximum gross weight of not more than 72,000 pounds, provided the distance between the second axle of the tractor and the rear axle of the trailer is at least 24 feet measured to the nearest foot. For each foot or fraction of a foot less than 24 feet, measured to the nearest foot, a reduction of 2,000 pounds in the maximum gross weight shall be made. The permit fee shall be $15.00.

5- or more axle tractor semi-trailer or truck trailer combination with a maximum gross weight of not more than 76,000 pounds, provided that the distance between the first and last axle of two consecutive sets of tandem axles is at least 24 feet measured to the nearest foot. For each foot or fraction of a foot less than 24 feet, measured to the nearest foot, a reduction of 2,000 pounds in the maximum gross weight shall be made. The permit fee shall be $15.00.

No single axle of a tandem axle unit shall support more than 60 percent of the total weight supported by such tandem axle unit.

No single axle of a tri-axle unit shall support more than 40 percent of the total weight supported by such tri-axle unit.

The maximum load on any axle of such vehicle shall not exceed more than 600 pounds per inch of tire width computed in conformity with the manufacturer’s designated width.

A five percent tolerance shall be allowed on the gross vehicle weights allowed under permits issued pursuant to this subdivision.

(15)

Despite the axle load provisions of section 1391 of this title and the axle spacing and the maximum gross load of subdivision (4) of this section, a 5-axle tractor semi-trailer may operate on State highways with the following conditions:

(A)

For each foot or fraction of a foot less than 36 feet between the first and last axle of two consecutive sets of tandem axles, a reduction of 2,000 pounds in the maximum gross weight of 80,000 pounds shall be made.

(B)

Conditions in subdivisions (14)(D) and (F) of this section shall also apply to this subdivision (B), and unless authorized by federal law, this subdivision shall not apply to operation on the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways.

(16)

Notwithstanding the axle load provisions of section 1391 of this title and the maximum gross load of subdivision (4) of this section, a five or more axle truck tractor, semi-trailer combination, or truck trailer combination, when the load consists solely of unprocessed milk products as defined in subdivision 4(55) of this title, may be registered for and operated with a maximum gross weight of 90,000 pounds on State highways without permit and upon posted State and town highways and those highways designated as the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways when the vehicle has been issued a permit in compliance with the provisions of section 1400 of this title; however:

(A)

Vehicles operated pursuant to this subdivision (16) shall be subject to the same axle spacing restrictions as are applied to five or more axle vehicles registered to 80,000 pounds as set forth in subdivision (4) of this section.

(B)

On those highways designated as the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, the provisions of subsection 1391(c) of this title shall apply unless other axle load limits, tolerances, or both, are authorized under federal law.

(C)

The fee for the annual permit as provided in this subdivision (16) shall be $10.00 when the fee has been paid to register the vehicle for 90,000 pounds or $382.00 when the vehicle is registered for 80,000 pounds.

(17)

Notwithstanding the gross vehicle weight provisions of subdivision (4) of this section, a truck trailer combination or truck tractor, semi-trailer combination with six or more load-bearing axles shall be allowed to bear a maximum of 99,000 pounds by special annual permit, which shall expire with the vehicle’s registration, except for vehicles not registered in Vermont in which case the permit shall become void on January 1 following the date of issue, for operating on designated routes on State and town highways, subject to the following:

(A)

The combination of vehicles must have, as a minimum, a distance of 51 feet between extreme axles.

(B)

The axle weight provisions of section 1391 of this title and subdivision 1392(6) of this section shall also apply to vehicles permitted under this subdivision.

(C)

When determining the fine for a gross overweight violation of this subdivision, the fine for any portion of the first 10,000 pounds over the permitted weight shall be the same as provided in section 1391a of this title, and for overweight violations 10,001 pounds or more over the permitted weight, the fine schedule provided in section 1391a shall be doubled.

(D)

The weight permitted by this subdivision shall be allowed for foreign trucks that are registered or permitted for 99,000 pounds in a state or province that recognizes Vermont vehicles for weights consistent with this subdivision.

(E)

Unless authorized by federal law, the provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to operation on the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways.

(F)

The fee for the annual permit as provided in this subdivision (17) shall be $415.00 for vehicles bearing up to 90,000 pounds and $560.00 for vehicles bearing up to 99,000 pounds.

(G)

[Repealed.]

(18)

The owner of any Vermont or foreign registered motor vehicle seeking permits authorized by this section shall make application for the appropriate permits and pay the appropriate permit fees.

(19) (A)

A person issued a permit under the provisions of subdivision (13), (14), (16), or (17) of this section, and upon payment of a $10.00 administrative fee for each additional permit, may obtain additional permits for the same vehicle, provided the additional permit is for a lesser weight and provided the vehicle or combination of vehicles meets the minimum requirements for the permit sought as set forth in this section.

(B)

A person issued a permit under the provisions of subdivision (14) of this section, and upon payment of the difference in fees for each permit sought, may obtain additional permits for the same vehicle, provided the vehicle or combination of vehicles meets the minimum requirements for the permit sought as set forth in this section.

(C)

[Repealed.]

(20)

[Repealed.]

(21)

All permits issued pursuant to this section shall be carried in the vehicle. The fine for violation of this subdivision shall be $150.00. A violation of this subdivision shall be considered an offense separate from an overweight violation.

Distance between the center of the first and center of the last axle of any group of two or more axles Maximum load in pounds carried in any group of two or more axles computed to the nearest 500 pounds 2 axles 3 axles 4 axles 5 axles 6 axles 7 axles 8 or less 34,000 34,000 9 39,000 42,500 10 40,000 43,500 11 44,000 12 45,000 50,000 13 45,500 50,500 14 46,500 51,500 15 47,000 52,000 16 48,000 52,500 17 48,500 53,500 18 49,500 54,000 19 50,000 54,500 20 51,000 55,500 66,000 21 51,500 56,000 66,500 22 52,500 56,500 67,000 23 53,000 57,500 68,000 24 54,000 58,000 68,500 74,000 25 54,500 58,500 69,000 74,500 26 55,500 59,500 69,500 75,000 27 56,000 60,000 70,000 75,500 28 57,000 60,500 71,000 76,500 29 57,500 61,500 71,500 77,000 30 58,500 62,000 72,000 77,500 31 59,000 62,500 72,500 78,000 32 60,000 63,500 73,000 78,500 33 64,000 74,000 79,000 34 64,500 74,500 80,000 35 65,500 75,000 80,000 36 66,000 70,500 75,500 80,000 37 66,500 71,000 76,000 80,000 38 67,500 72,000 77,000 80,000 39 68,000 72,500 77,500 80,000 40 68,500 73,000 78,000 80,000 41 69,500 73,500 78,500 80,000 42 70,000 74,000 79,000 80,000 43 75,000 80,000 80,000 44 75,500 80,000 80,000 45 76,000 80,000 80,000 46 76,500 80,000 80,000 47 77,500 80,000 80,000 48 78,000 80,000 80,000 49 78,500 80,000 80,000 50 79,000 80,000 80,000 51 80,000 80,000 80,000

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 63

, eff. March 27, 1959;

1961, No. 94

, eff. May 3, 1961;

1961, No. 281

, §§ 1-5;

1963, No. 206

, § 5;

1967, No. 166

, eff. April 15, 1967;

1967, No. 385

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1975, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. April 7, 1976;

1977, No. 15

;

1977, No. 41

, § 2, eff. April 19, 1977;

1977, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2-4, 12, eff. May 1, 1978;

1981, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 11a;

1983, No. 86

, § 3;

1983, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 27, 1984;

1985, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1987, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 4, eff. May 13, 1988;

1987, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1989, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2, eff. May 12, 1990;

1989, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1991, No. 68

, §§ 1-3, eff. June 24, 1991;

1991, No. 72

, §§ 2, 3;

1995, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 25, 1996;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. May 15, 2002;

2001, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 38, 39, eff. June 21, 2002;

2003, No. 70

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. March 1, 2004;

2007, No. 61

, § 7;

2009, No. 50

, § 51;

2009, No. 63

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2, eff. Jan. 13, 2010, § 4, see effective date note;

2011, No. 23

, § 2, eff. May 11, 2011;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2017, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. Jan. 1, 2019;

2021, No. 20

, § 246.

§ 1392a.
Authority of Commissioner to delegate permitting functions.

The Commissioner may delegate any person as his or her agent to perform the duties set forth in sections 1392, 1400 through 1404, 1406, 1415, and 1431 of this title with respect to permits.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 25, 1996.

§ 1393.
Weight limits in cities; adoption by towns or incorporated villages of State limits; limits on class 1 town highways.

On all highways in a city, the legal load shall be as prescribed for the State Highway System in section 1392 of this title, unless otherwise restricted and posted by the local authorities as provided in this subchapter.
(a) (1) On all highways in a city, the legal load shall be as prescribed for the State Highway System in section 1392 of this title, unless otherwise restricted and posted by the local authorities as provided in this subchapter.

With the approval of the Secretary of Transportation, the legislative body of a town or incorporated village may designate any highway under its jurisdiction to carry the same legal load as specified in section 1392 of this title for the State Highway System. When a certain highway has been so approved by the Secretary and the legislative body as to the legal load limit, then the Secretary shall have the highway posted for the legal load limit.

Except as provided in subdivision 1392(1) of this title, State Highway System weight limits as specified in section 1392 of this title shall apply to class 1 town highways.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 27, 1992;

1993, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1995, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2015, No. 47

, § 32;

2017, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 1394.
Designation of class 1 town highways.

The class 1 town highways connecting the State highways through cities, villages, or municipalities shall be designated by the State Transportation Board and marked by the State Secretary of Transportation.
The State Secretary of Transportation shall have signs erected on each road that leads off the State Highway System stating the legal load of the highway leading from the State Highway System.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 7

, eff. Feb. 14, 1975.

§ 1395.
Repealed. 1993, No. 186 (Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 1396.
Special limits for bridges and highways.

When, in the opinion of the Secretary of Transportation, a highway or bridge on the State Highway System or class 1 town highway, or when, in the opinion of the legislative body of a municipality, any class 2, 3, or 4 town highway or bridge under the jurisdiction of the municipality may be varied from the weight limit specified in section 1392 of this title, then the Secretary of Transportation for the State Highway System or the legislative body may designate the legal load limit for the highway or bridge. However, when the legislative body of a municipality requests in writing, the Secretary of Transportation may set the weight limit on a class 1 town highway at less than the State highway limit under section 1392 of this title, if a reasonable alternative route is available for those vehicles traveling at the State highway limit.

In making the determination as to whether a reasonable alternative route is available, the Secretary of Transportation shall, at a minimum, consider the following factors:

whether the alternative routing will reduce or relieve traffic congestion in a downtown area;

whether the alternative routing will enhance safety;

the length of the alternative route, and any increase in time made necessary by use of the alternative route;

whether an adverse effect has been created relative to the quiet enjoyment and property values of persons living along the alternative route.

Any decision of the Secretary made under this section may be appealed, in writing, to the Transportation Board within 30 days of the Secretary’s decision. The Transportation Board shall decide the question within 45 days of receipt of the appeal and may take evidence or testimony. Except as otherwise provided, the designated legal load limit for the highway or bridge shall not be less than 20,000 pounds for a single traction engine, tractor, trailer, motor truck, or other motor vehicle for the State system or any class 1 or 2 town highway nor less than 16,000 pounds for any other town highway.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 61

, § 27, eff. June 3, 1993;

1993, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1995, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 203.

§ 1397.
Signs.

When the weight limit on a highway or bridge has been adjusted by the Secretary of Transportation, the selectboard of a town, the trustees of an incorporated village, or the city council of a city, as to the legal load limit, then the Secretary, selectboard, trustees, or city council shall have each restricted highway or bridge posted for the legal load limit permitted. The notices shall be of a permanent nature and shall be placed at each end of each restricted highway in each town, village, or city affected or on the approaches to each restricted bridge. The notices shall state the legal load limit permitted to be operated over the highway or bridge.

The notices specified in subsection (a) of this section may be omitted when the restricted highway is a class 4 town highway or a class 3 town highway serving only one residence.

HISTORY:

Amended

1991, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 27, 1992;

1993, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1995, No. 73

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 1398.
Certified statement to be filed.

A certified statement shall be filed with the clerk in each town, village, or city in which the posting occurs, as provided in section 1397 of this title, stating the location of the highway or bridge posted, the legal load limit to which such highway or bridge is restricted, and the date of posting. If such restriction is removed at any time by the Secretary of Transportation, selectboard, trustees, or city council, a similar certified statement of the removal shall be filed with the clerk of the town, village, or city as the case may be.

§ 1399.
Exceptions for construction and maintenance equipment; fire apparatus; and heavy-duty tow and recovery vehicles.

As used in this section, “heavy-duty tow and recovery vehicle” means a vehicle that:

is transporting a disabled vehicle from the place where the vehicle became disabled to the nearest appropriate repair facility; and

has a gross vehicle weight that is equal to or exceeds the gross vehicle weight of the disabled vehicle being transported.

Nothing contained in sections 1391-1398 of this title shall restrict the weight of:

Snow plows, road machines, oilers, traction engines, tractors, rollers, power shovels, dump wagons, trucks, or other construction or maintenance equipment when used by any town, incorporated village, city, or the State in the construction or the maintenance of any highway, provided that such construction or maintenance is performed by persons employed by or under contract with such town, incorporated village, city, or the State for this purpose. However, any operation of motorized highway building equipment or road making appliances used in construction work contracted by a town, incorporated village, city, or the State shall be unrestricted as to weight only within a construction area.

Municipal and volunteer fire apparatus.

Heavy-duty tow and recovery vehicles on the Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways.

HISTORY:

Amended

1991, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.);

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. July 13, 2020.

§ 1400.
Permit to operate in excess of weight and size limits; State highways.

A person or corporation owning or operating a traction engine, tractor, trailer, motor truck, or other motor vehicle that desires to operate it over State highways or class 1 town highways in excess of the weight and size limits provided by this subchapter shall apply to the Commissioner for a permit. In his or her discretion, with or without hearing, the Commissioner may issue to the person or corporation a permit authorizing the person to operate the traction engine, tractor, trailer, motor truck, or other motor vehicle upon State highways and class 1 town highways as he or she may designate and containing the regulation subject to which the traction engine, tractor, trailer, motor truck, or other motor vehicle is to be operated. The permit shall not be granted until satisfactory proof is furnished to the Commissioner that the traction engine, tractor, trailer, motor truck, or other motor vehicle has been registered and the prescribed fee paid for a gross weight equal to a maximum legal load limit for its class. No additional registration fee shall be payable to authorize the use of the traction engine, tractor, trailer, motor truck, or other motor vehicle in accordance with the terms of the permit. The approval may be withdrawn for cause, and may be withdrawn without cause any time after March 31 next following the date of issuance. When approval is withdrawn for cause or on March 31, the Commissioner shall forthwith revoke the permit; when approval is withdrawn otherwise, he or she shall revoke the permit within one month.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any vehicle registered in another state, provided the vehicle meets all weight and size requirements of this State and is registered or holds a permit in the other state for the weight that the permit is sought.

In addition, the Commissioner may issue permits to operate vehicles in excess of the size limits provided by this subchapter for operation over any class 2, class 3, or class 4 town highways except when the dimensions are such that blanket permits cannot be issued under the duly adopted rules of the Commissioner. In those instances, permits under section 1400a of this title shall be obtained.

[Repealed.]

Notwithstanding any other statute or rule to the contrary, overweight permits shall not be issued to vehicles registered in another state or province, unless that state or province issues similar permits on a reciprocal basis to vehicles registered in Vermont.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 281

, § 6;

1969, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 25, 1970;

1975, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. April 7, 1976;

1987, No. 91

, § 8, eff. June 22, 1987;

1989, No. 121

, § 20d;

1993, No. 27

, § 7, eff. May 19, 1993;

1993, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1995, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. April 25, 1996;

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 73.

§ 1400a.
Special local highway and bridge limits; reimbursement for damages; special permits.

A person or corporation owning or operating a traction engine, tractor trailer, motor truck, or other motor vehicle that desires to operate it in excess of the weight limits provided in this subchapter over highways and bridges under the jurisdiction of a municipality with the exception of class 1 town highways and subject to the provisions of subsection 1400(c) of this title shall make application for a permit to the appropriate legislative body or its designee.

The application form for such a permit shall be of a uniform type and shall be developed by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, after consulting with municipal officials and representatives of the State’s trucking industry.

The selectboard, trustees, or the mayor are authorized to accept for the municipality compensation commensurate with the extra wear or maintenance required on the highway traveled over or on any bridge by reason of the overweight allowed by any permit approved by them or any exemption provided under section 1400d of this title, which shall be used for the maintenance of highways and bridges within the town, village, or city. The following factors, at a minimum, shall be taken into consideration when determining the amount of compensation due:
(c) (1) The selectboard, trustees, or the mayor are authorized to accept for the municipality compensation commensurate with the extra wear or maintenance required on the highway traveled over or on any bridge by reason of the overweight allowed by any permit approved by them or any exemption provided under section 1400d of this title, which shall be used for the maintenance of highways and bridges within the town, village, or city. The following factors, at a minimum, shall be taken into consideration when determining the amount of compensation due:

the amount of weight allowed in excess of the normal limit;

the configuration and number of axles of the vehicle involved;

the number and length of trips the vehicle will be making;

the condition of the highway before and after use by the vehicle and costs associated with any needed repair.

If the agreement for the compensation to be paid is in writing, failure on the part of the applicant to pay the sum or sums agreed upon shall be sufficient cause for the selectboard, trustees, or mayor to withdraw approval for the permit. A fee not in excess of $5.00 may be charged for the written approval of a municipality furnished under this section.

A $5.00 fee for administration of permits imposed under this section shall be for the period expiring March 31 of each year. As an alternative, upon payment of an administrative fee of $10.00, an applicant may obtain a permit to operate all of his or her registered vehicles in that municipality, under the conditions of the permit, for the period of the permit. In the event a fleet permit is obtained, individual permits need not be carried in each vehicle permitted.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1995, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. April 25, 1996;

2003, No. 56

, § 54, eff. June 4, 2003;

2003, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 1400b.
Filing of restrictions, publication.

Any municipality that has enacted special weight limits that are other than State legal limits for highways or bridges within its jurisdiction shall file a complete copy of the limitations with the Department of Motor Vehicles not later than February 10 of each year. The information filed shall contain a concise listing of each highway or bridge posted, the time of the year the restrictions apply, weight limitations in effect on that highway or bridge, and the name, address, and telephone number of the principal person or persons responsible for issuing the local permit. Additions or deletions to the listing may be made from time to time, as required, by filing with the Department.

Any special municipal weight limits on highways or bridges shall be unenforceable unless they are on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles within three working days of the date of posting. It shall be the responsibility of the municipality to keep records documenting the time and date a highway or bridge is posted, and to keep current restrictions on file with the Department. The Department may prescribe the format that is to be used when filing restrictions under this section.

The Department shall publish, on an annual basis, a list of municipal highways or bridges and their current weight limits. This publication shall be based on the information submitted by the municipalities under subsection (a) of this section, as well as information available through the Agency of Transportation, and shall be available to the public, at a charge not in excess of $25.00, on or before April 1 of each year.

The Department shall also publish, on a quarterly basis, a periodic update of current weight limits for municipal highways and bridges and shall make that available to the general public at a cost of not more than $5.00.

Any person may request information on specific municipalities from the Department and shall pay the Department a fee of $3.00 per request. A single request shall be made for information on each municipality. In the event nothing is filed by a particular municipality, the Department shall provide that information, in written form, and charge the $3.00 fee.

The Commissioner may require prepayments for information requested pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Jan. 1, 1995.

§ 1400c.
Gross limits on town highways and bridges.

When a town bridge or highway is posted for State limits, the gross weight limits on town highways and bridges shall be the weight allowed by the State, including any additional weight allowed by permit.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 1400d.
Agricultural service vehicles.

An agricultural service vehicle, as defined in subdivision 4(71) of this title, shall be exempt from the provisions of sections 1400 and 1400a of this title if the gross weight does not exceed 60,000 pounds.

Municipalities shall not be liable for injuries or damages to agricultural service vehicles or their operators that result from crossing a posted bridge with an agricultural service vehicle that weighs more than the posted weight limit.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 109

, (Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 1401.
Contents of permit.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall incorporate in the permit such descriptive matter as to the highways to be traveled over, his or her restrictions as to width and character of the wheels of such tractor, trailer, motor truck, or other motor vehicle, and such other regulations as in his or her judgment seem most conducive to a proper use of the highways.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 governing the conditions to be incorporated in the permit. These rules shall also assign each condition to one of three categories, depending on the seriousness of a violation of the condition.

Violation of a rule adopted under this section shall constitute a traffic violation.

A person who violates a rule adopted under this section shall be subject to the following penalties: $100.00 for a Category I violation; $200.00 for a Category II violation; and $300.00 for a Category III violation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 25, 1970;

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 9b, eff. Aug. 1, 1998.